Washington statutes.
RCW 8.04.098

Acquisition when several ownerships—Public use.

At the time and place appointed for hearing the petition, the court may enter an order adjudicating public use as affecting all tracts of land, property, or property rights as described therein, which order shall be final as to those respondents not seeking a review to the supreme court or the court of appeals within five days after the entry thereof.

[ 1971 c 81 s 34; 1955 c 156 s 2. Formerly RCW 8.04.200.]